Washington statutes.
RCW 44.44.030

Personnel—Member of American academy of actuaries.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5168-S.SL) ***

(1) Subject to RCW 44.04.260, the state actuary shall have the authority to select and employ such research, technical, clerical personnel, and consultants as the actuary deems necessary, whose salaries shall be fixed by the actuary and approved by the state actuary appointment committee, and who shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) All actuarial valuations and experience studies performed by the office of the state actuary shall be signed by a member of the American academy of actuaries. If the state actuary is not such a member, the state actuary, after approval by the select committee, shall contract for a period not to exceed two years with a member of the American academy of actuaries to assist in developing actuarial valuations and experience studies.

[ 2003 c 295 s 14; 2001 c 259 s 11; 1987 c 25 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 21.]